Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.090

Subpoenas—Compelling attendance of witnesses, fees—Immunity of witnesses.

The director shall have the power to issue subpoenas for the production of any books, records, or documents of any kind and to subpoena witnesses to be produced or to appear (as the case may be) in the county wherein the principal party involved in such hearing resides. No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or from producing documentary evidence before the director in obedience to the subpoena of the director on the ground or for the reason that the testimony or evidence, documentary or otherwise, required of him or her may tend to incriminate him or her or subject him or her to a penalty or forfeiture, but no natural person shall be prosecuted or subject to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter or thing concerning which he or she may be so required to testify or produce evidence, documentary or otherwise, before the director in obedience to a subpoena issued by him or her: PROVIDED, That no natural person so testifying shall be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury committed in so testifying. The superior court of the county in which any such hearing or proceeding may be had, may compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of records, papers, books, accounts, documents and testimony as required by such subpoena. In case any witness refuses to attend or testify or produce any papers required by the subpoena, the director or his or her examiner shall so report to the superior court of the county in which the proceeding is pending by petition setting forth that due notice was given of the time and place of attendance of the witness or the production of the papers and that the witness has been summoned in the manner prescribed in this chapter and that the fees and mileage of the witness have been paid or tendered to him or her in accordance with RCW 2.40.020 and that he or she has failed to attend or produce the papers required by the subpoena at the hearing, cause, or proceeding specified in the notice and subpoena, or has refused to answer questions propounded to him or her in the course of such hearing, cause or proceeding, and shall ask an order of the court to compel such witness to appear and testify before the director. The court upon such petition shall enter an order directing the witness to appear before the court at a time and place to be fixed in such order and then and there show cause why he or she has not responded to the subpoena. A certified copy of the show cause order shall be served upon the witness. If it shall appear to the court that the subpoena was regularly issued, the court shall enter a decree that the witness appear at the time and place fixed in the decree and testify or produce the required papers, and on failing to obey said decree the witness shall be dealt with as for contempt of court.

[ 2002 c 313 s 9; 1961 c 256 s 9.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.